Alabama, session 2026rs, HB528.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as
the "Alabama Dementia Network Act."
Section 2. (a) The Alabama Dementia Network is
established within the Alabama Department of Public Health.
(b) The Alabama Dementia Network shall be a coordinated
statewide program to do all of the following:
(1) Support provider education and enable early
identification and assessment of cognitive impairment and
improved care.
(2) Increase geographic accessibility to Alzheimer's
diagnosis and treatment.
(3) Facilitate referrals to specialty care and
community-based services.
(4) Support caregivers and individuals living with
dementia.
(c) The Alabama Department of Public Health shall
designate hubs to provide clinical education, diagnostic
services, family support, and ongoing referrals.
(d) The Alabama Department of Public Health shall adopt
rules necessary to administer the Alabama Dementia Network,
including, but not limited to:
Page 2

including, but not limited to:
HB528 INTRODUCED
(1) Establishing eligibility, program, and operational
requirements for health systems, and academic medical centers
or other qualified entities for participation in the Alabama
Dementia Network;
(2) Setting minimum standards for the use of care
plans;
(3) Setting standards for allowable uses of telehealth
or other remote care delivery options; and
(4) Establishing data collection, reporting, and
privacy protections.
(e) The Alabama Department of Public Health may adopt
rules necessary to implement and administer this act.
Section 3. (a) The Alabama Department of Public Health
shall partner with other entities to implement and administer
this act, which may include any of the following:
(1) Other state agencies, including, but not limited
to, the Department of Senior Services, the Alabama Medicaid
Agency, and the Department of Mental Health.
(2) Local health departments.
(3) Nonprofit organizations, including organizations
with missions relating to Alzheimer's disease, dementia care,
and caregiver support.
(4) Institutions of higher education and research
entities.
(b) The partnerships may include coordination of
services, shared training initiatives, public awareness
efforts, and data-sharing agreements consistent with state and
federal law.
Page 3

federal law.
HB528 INTRODUCED
Section 4. (a) The Alabama Department of Public Health
shall collect data necessary to measure the effectiveness,
reach, and outcomes of the Alabama Dementia Network,
consistent with applicable privacy and confidentiality laws.
(b) The Alabama Department of Public Health shall
publish an annual public report summarizing the Alabama
Dementia Network Activities, outcomes, and recommendations for
program improvement or expansion. The report shall be made
available on the Alabama Department of Public Health's
publicly accessible website.
Section 5. Nothing in this act shall be construed to
require an appropriation. The Alabama Dementia Network may be
supported through available federal funds, grants,
public-private partnerships, or legislative appropriations.
Section 6. This act shall become effective on October
100 1, 2026.
Page 4